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DTC C1233 /33,C 1234 /34 YawRateSensorCircuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1233 /33

Whenanyof the following 1. through4. isdetected:
1.ECUterminal IG 1 voltage is9.5V to 17.0V,and the

condition that yaw rate sensor voltage is out of the range
from0.25Vto4.75Vcontinued for 1 sec.ormore.

2. The conditions that yaw rate sensor open detect circuit
signal isONand thevoltageofECUterminal IG 1 is9.5
V t o 17Vcontinued for 1 sec.ormore.

3. The conditions that yaw rate sensor power source volt-
age is out of the range from 4.4 V to 5.6 V and the volt-
ageofECUterminal IG 1 is9.5V to 17Vcontinued for 1
sec. or more.

4. When the condition that yaw rate sensor signal is mo-
mentarilyopenoccurs 10 timesormoreand thevoltage
ofECUterminal IG 1 is9.5V to 17 V .

SYawratesensor
SYawratesensorcircuit

C1234 /34

Condition 1.or2. isdetected:
1.When thecondition thatyawratesensorVYSterminal

voltage is 4.75 V to 5.25 V and YD malfunction signal of
yaw rate sensor is ON continued for 5 sec. or more.

2. Shift lever position is in P range and output voltage of
yawratesensor isoutof the range from2.4V to2.6V
or after the difference from zero point calibration voltage
of yaw rate sensor has become 0.08 V or more and
when the condition that the vehicle speed exceeds more
than 15km/h (9mph)whileoutputconditionofyawrate
sensor has been repeated more than 3 times.

Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the yaw rate sensor circuit, the ECU prohibits TRC & VSC controls.

DI6XH−01



F09210

Yaw Rate Sensor

YD

GYAW

YAW2

VYS

3

1

5

4

(Shielded)

W−R

W

W−L

L

21

22

11

10

9

IG4

IG4

IG4

IG4

IG4

(Shielded)

W−R

W

W−L

L

ABS & BA & TRC &
VSC ECU

18

27

28

9

19

A54 YSS

YD

GYAW

YAW

VYS

A54

A54

A54

A54

F02808

−DIAGNOSTICS ABS&VEHICLESTABILITYCONTROL(VSC)&
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI−63

LANDCRUISER(W/G)SUP(RM73 1E)

WIRING DIAGRAM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Start the inspection fromstep 1 incaseofusing thehand −held testerandstart fromstep2 incaseofnot
using thehand −held tester.

1 Checkoutputvalueof theyawratesensor.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the 2 bolts and yaw rate sensor with connector

still connected.
(b)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(c)Turn the ignitionswitchONandpush thehand −held tes-

ter main switch ON.
(d)Select theDATALISTmodeon thehand −held tester.
CHECK:
Check that theyawratevalueof theyawratesensordisplayed
on thehand −held tester ischanging:Place theyawratesensor
vertically to the ground and turn the sensor pivoted on its center.
OK:

Yaw rate value must be changing.

OK Go to step 5.

NG
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2 Check whether continuity exists between terminal YD of yaw rate sensor and ter-
minal YD of ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU (See page IN−35).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

3 Check voltage between terminals YD and GND of ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU.

PREPARATION:
Remove ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU with connector still con-
nected.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(b) Measure voltage between terminals YD and GND of ABS

& BA & TRC & VSC ECU.
OK:

Voltage:4.5 − 5.3V

NG Replace yaw rate sensor.

OK

Check and replace ABS & BA & TRC & VSC
ECU.
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4 Check yaw rate sensor.

CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(b) Measure voltage between terminals 1 and 3, 3 and 4 of

the yaw rate sensor with connector still connected.
OK:

Terminals 1 and 3
(YAW − GYAW)

Approx. 2.5 V

Terminals 3 and 4
(GYAW − YD)

Approx.4.5V − 5.3V

NG Replace yaw rate sensor.

OK

5 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between yaw rate
sensor and ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU (See page IN−35).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace ABS & BA & TRC & VSC
ECU.


